Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-1519
Township counties without county road unit system; sections applicable.

The provisions of sections 39-1519 to 39-1527 shall relate only to those counties under the township organization not operating under a county road unit system as provided in sections 39-1513 to 39-1518.

Laws 1957, c. 155, art. II, § 19, p. 521;

Laws 1959, c. 167, § 5, p. 610.

For other applicable provisions in township counties not having road unit system, see sections 23-228 and 23-265.